Illinois, session 104th, HB3875.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Sections 11a-9 and 11a-18 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/11a-9)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-9)7    Sec. 11a-9. Report.8    (a) The petition for adjudication of disability and for 9appointment of a guardian should be accompanied by a report 10which contains (1) a description of the nature and type of the 11respondent's disability and an assessment of how the 12disability impacts on the ability of the respondent to make 13decisions or to function independently; (2) an analysis and 14results of evaluations of the respondent's mental and physical 15condition and, where appropriate, educational condition, 16adaptive behavior and social skills, which have been performed 17within 3 months of the date of the filing of the petition, or, 18in the case of an intellectual disability, a psychological 19evaluation of the respondent that has been performed by a 20clinical psychologist licensed under the Clinical Psychologist 21Licensing Act, within one year of the date of the filing of the 22petition, or a psychological evaluation that assesses the 23cognitive, emotional, and functional capacities of the   HB3875- 2 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1respondent and that has been performed by a licensed clinical 2psychologist under the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act 3within 3 months of the date of the filing of the petition or 4within one year of the date of the filing of the petition in 5the case of an individual with an intellectual disability; (3) 6an opinion as to whether guardianship is needed, the type and 7scope of the guardianship needed, and the reasons therefor; 8(4) a recommendation as to the most suitable living 9arrangement and, where appropriate, treatment or habilitation 10plan for the respondent and the reasons therefor; (5) the 11name, business address, business telephone number, and 12signatures of all persons who performed the evaluations upon 13which the report is based, one of whom shall be a licensed 14physician or a licensed clinical psychologist under the 15Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, or may, in the case of an 16intellectual disability, be a clinical psychologist licensed 17under the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, and a statement 18of the certification, license, or other credentials that 19qualify the evaluators who prepared the report.20    (b) If for any reason no report accompanies the petition, 21the court shall order appropriate evaluations to be performed 22by a qualified person or persons and a report prepared and 23filed with the court at least 10 days prior to the hearing.24    (b-5) Upon oral or written motion by the respondent or the 25guardian ad litem or upon the court's own motion, the court 26shall appoint one or more independent experts to examine the   HB3875- 3 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1respondent. Upon the filing with the court of a verified 2statement of services rendered by the expert or experts, the 3court shall determine a reasonable fee for the services 4performed. If the respondent is unable to pay the fee, the 5court may enter an order upon the petitioner to pay the entire 6fee or such amount as the respondent is unable to pay. However, 7in cases where the Office of State Guardian is the petitioner, 8consistent with Section 30 of the Guardianship and Advocacy 9Act, no expert services fees shall be assessed against the 10Office of the State Guardian.11    (c) Unless the court otherwise directs, any report 12prepared pursuant to this Section shall not be made part of the 13public record of the proceedings but shall be available to the 14court or an appellate court in which the proceedings are 15subject to review, to the respondent, the petitioner, the 16guardian, and their attorneys, to the respondent's guardian ad 17litem, and to such other persons as the court may direct.18    Accessibility to a report prepared pursuant to this 19Section shall be in accordance with Section 5 of the Court 20Record and Document Accessibility Act. 21(Source: P.A. 102-109, eff. 1-1-22; 103-166, eff. 1-1-24.) 22    (755 ILCS 5/11a-18)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-18)23    Sec. 11a-18. Duties of the estate guardian. 24    (a) To the extent specified in the order establishing the 25guardianship, the guardian of the estate shall have the care,   HB3875- 4 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1management and investment of the estate, shall manage the 2estate frugally and shall apply the income and principal of 3the estate so far as necessary for the comfort and suitable 4support and education of the ward, his minor and adult 5dependent children, and persons related by blood or marriage 6who are dependent upon or entitled to support from him, or for 7any other purpose which the court deems to be for the best 8interests of the ward, and the court may approve the making on 9behalf of the ward of such agreements as the court determines 10to be for the ward's best interests. The guardian may make 11disbursement of his ward's funds and estate directly to the 12ward or other distributee or in such other manner and in such 13amounts as the court directs. If the estate of a ward is 14derived in whole or in part from payments of compensation, 15adjusted compensation, pension, insurance or other similar 16benefits made directly to the estate by the Veterans 17Administration, notice of the application for leave to invest 18or expend the ward's funds or estate, together with a copy of 19the petition and proposed order, shall be given to the 20Veterans' Administration Regional Office in this State at 21least 7 days before the hearing on the application.22    (a-5) The probate court, upon petition of a guardian, 23other than the guardian of a minor, and after notice to all 24other persons interested as the court directs, may authorize 25the guardian to exercise any or all powers over the estate and 26business affairs of the ward that the ward could exercise if   HB3875- 5 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1present and not under disability. The court may authorize the 2taking of an action or the application of funds not required 3for the ward's current and future maintenance and support in 4any manner approved by the court as being in keeping with the 5ward's wishes so far as they can be ascertained. The court must 6consider the permanence of the ward's disabling condition and 7the natural objects of the ward's bounty. In ascertaining and 8carrying out the ward's wishes the court may consider, but 9shall not be limited to, minimization of State or federal 10income, estate, or inheritance taxes; and providing gifts to 11charities, relatives, and friends that would be likely 12recipients of donations from the ward. The ward's wishes as 13best they can be ascertained shall be carried out, whether or 14not tax savings are involved. Actions or applications of funds 15may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:16        (1) making gifts of income or principal, or both, of 17    the estate, either outright or in trust;18        (2) conveying, releasing, or disclaiming his or her 19    contingent and expectant interests in property, including 20    marital property rights and any right of survivorship 21    incident to joint tenancy or tenancy by the entirety;22        (3) releasing or disclaiming his or her powers as 23    trustee, personal representative, custodian for minors, or 24    guardian;25        (4) exercising, releasing, or disclaiming his or her 26    powers as donee of a power of appointment;  HB3875- 6 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1        (5) entering into contracts;2        (6) creating for the benefit of the ward or others, 3    revocable or irrevocable trusts of his or her property 4    that may extend beyond his or her disability or life;5        (7) exercising options of the ward to purchase or 6    exchange securities or other property;7        (8) exercising the rights of the ward to elect benefit 8    or payment options, to terminate, to change beneficiaries 9    or ownership, to assign rights, to borrow, or to receive 10    cash value in return for a surrender of rights under any 11    one or more of the following:12            (i) life insurance policies, plans, or benefits,13            (ii) annuity policies, plans, or benefits,14            (iii) mutual fund and other dividend investment 15        plans,16            (iv) retirement, profit sharing, and employee 17        welfare plans and benefits;18        (9) exercising his or her right to claim or disclaim 19    an elective share in the estate of his or her deceased 20    spouse and to renounce any interest by testate or 21    intestate succession or by inter vivos transfer;22        (10) changing the ward's residence or domicile; or23        (11) modifying by means of codicil or trust amendment 24    the terms of the ward's will or any revocable trust 25    created by the ward, as the court may consider advisable 26    in light of changes in applicable tax laws.  HB3875- 7 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1    The guardian in his or her petition shall briefly outline 2the action or application of funds for which he or she seeks 3approval, the results expected to be accomplished thereby, and 4the tax savings, if any, expected to accrue. The proposed 5action or application of funds may include gifts of the ward's 6personal property or real estate, but transfers of real estate 7shall be subject to the requirements of Section 20 of this Act. 8Gifts may be for the benefit of prospective legatees, 9devisees, or heirs apparent of the ward or may be made to 10individuals or charities in which the ward is believed to have 11an interest. The guardian shall also indicate in the petition 12that any planned disposition is consistent with the intentions 13of the ward insofar as they can be ascertained, and if the 14ward's intentions cannot be ascertained, the ward will be 15presumed to favor reduction in the incidents of various forms 16of taxation and the partial distribution of his or her estate 17as provided in this subsection. The guardian shall not, 18however, be required to include as a beneficiary or fiduciary 19any person who he has reason to believe would be excluded by 20the ward. A guardian shall be required to investigate and 21pursue a ward's eligibility for governmental benefits.22    (a-6) The guardian may, without an order of court, open, 23maintain, and transfer funds to an ABLE account on behalf of 24the ward and the ward's minor and adult dependent children as 25specified under Section 16.6 of the State Treasurer Act. 26    (b) Upon the direction of the court which issued his   HB3875- 8 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1letters, a guardian may perform the contracts of his ward 2which were legally subsisting at the time of the commencement 3of the ward's disability. The court may authorize the guardian 4to execute and deliver any bill of sale, deed or other 5instrument.6    (c) The guardian of the estate of a ward shall appear for 7and represent the ward in all legal proceedings unless another 8person is appointed for that purpose as guardian or next 9friend. This does not impair the power of any court to appoint 10a guardian ad litem or next friend to defend the interests of 11the ward in that court, or to appoint or allow any person as 12the next friend of a ward to commence, prosecute or defend any 13proceeding in his behalf. Without impairing the power of the 14court in any respect, if the guardian of the estate of a ward 15and another person as next friend shall appear for and 16represent the ward in a legal proceeding in which the 17compensation of the attorney or attorneys representing the 18guardian and next friend is solely determined under a 19contingent fee arrangement, the guardian of the estate of the 20ward shall not participate in or have any duty to review the 21prosecution of the action, to participate in or review the 22appropriateness of any settlement of the action, or to 23participate in or review any determination of the 24appropriateness of any fees awarded to the attorney or 25attorneys employed in the prosecution of the action.26    (d) Adjudication of disability shall not revoke or   HB3875- 9 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1otherwise terminate a trust which is revocable by the ward. A 2guardian of the estate shall have no authority to revoke a 3trust that is revocable by the ward, except that the court may 4authorize a guardian to revoke a Totten trust or similar 5deposit or withdrawable capital account in trust to the extent 6necessary to provide funds for the purposes specified in 7paragraph (a) of this Section. If the trustee of any trust for 8the benefit of the ward has discretionary power to apply 9income or principal for the ward's benefit, the trustee shall 10not be required to distribute any of the income or principal to 11the guardian of the ward's estate, but the guardian may bring 12an action on behalf of the ward to compel the trustee to 13exercise the trustee's discretion or to seek relief from an 14abuse of discretion. This paragraph shall not limit the right 15of a guardian of the estate to receive accountings from the 16trustee on behalf of the ward.17    (d-5) Upon a verified petition by the plenary or limited 18guardian of the estate or the request of the ward that is 19accompanied by a current physician's or a licensed clinical 20psychologist's report that states the ward possesses 21testamentary capacity, the court may enter an order 22authorizing the ward to execute a will or codicil. In so 23ordering, the court shall authorize the guardian to retain 24independent counsel for the ward with whom the ward may 25execute or modify a will or codicil. 26    (e) Absent court order pursuant to the Illinois Power of   HB3875- 10 -LRB104 08146 JRC 18194 b1Attorney Act directing a guardian to exercise powers of the 2principal under an agency that survives disability, the 3guardian will have no power, duty or liability with respect to 4any property subject to the agency. This subsection (e) 5applies to all agencies, whenever and wherever executed.6    (f) Upon petition by any interested person (including the 7standby or short-term guardian), with such notice to 8interested persons as the court directs and a finding by the 9court that it is in the best interests of the person with a 10disability, the court may terminate or limit the authority of 11a standby or short-term guardian or may enter such other 12orders as the court deems necessary to provide for the best 13interests of the person with a disability. The petition for 14termination or limitation of the authority of a standby or 15short-term guardian may, but need not, be combined with a 16petition to have another guardian appointed for the person 17with a disability.18(Source: P.A. 101-329, eff. 8-9-19; 102-72, eff. 1-1-22.)